Oklahoma, session 2026, SB822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 270 of Title 56, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “universal basic income” means any


welfare program that provides a recurring source of income in the


form of a government transfer payment to all residents or citizens


or all adult residents or citizens within a designated area or


political boundary, which income is provided without a means test or


work requirement.


B. No universal basic income shall be provided by this state or


any political subdivision of this state.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-860 QD 12/10/2025 2:59:37 PMSTATE OF OKLAHOMA

Req. No. 860 Page 1



2nd Session of the 60th Legislature (2026)


SENATE BILL NO. ______ By: Jett






AS INTRODUCED


An Act relating to .


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:




60-2-3542 12/10/2025 2:59:37 PM






























Req. No. 860 Page 2